Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1505
Violations; penalty.

A person violating any provision of sections 48-1501 to 48-1504 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. In the case of a continuing violation, each day shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1984, LB 540, § 13.